Wisconsin, session 2025, AB922.
do enact as follows:AB922,11Section 1. 44.405 of the statutes is created to read:AB922,2,10244.405 Accessibility of department of transportation locations. If the 3secretary of transportation plans to take an action in order to meet the accessibility 4requirements under s. 106.53 and that action may cause or permit an adverse effect 5on historic property or listed property, the secretary of transportation shall ensure 6that the department of transportation’s historic preservation officer notifies the 7historical society at least 30 days before the planned action is taken, and the 8secretary of transportation shall ensure that the historical society is allowed to 9document the condition of the historic property or listed property in the period after 10the historical society is notified and before the planned action is taken.AB922,211Section 2. 106.53 of the statutes is created to read:AB922,3,712106.53 Accessibility of locations of department of transportation. 13Notwithstanding ss. 44.34 (10), 44.39, and 44.40 or any ordinance enacted pursuant 14to s. 59.69 (4m), 60.64, or 62.23 (7) (em), and subject to s. 44.405, the secretary of 15transportation shall ensure that each office location of the department where 1operators’ licenses are issued meets the accessibility standards for 2010 set forth in 228 CFR 35.151 and 36 CFR 1191 before January 1, 2030, to allow full public access 3to each location. A location that does not meet the standards shall be modified to 4meet the standards, and the secretary may not rely on the exceptions in 28 CFR 535.151 or 36 CFR 1191 or the requirements of an ordinance enacted pursuant to s. 659.69 (4m), 60.64, or 62.23 (7) (em) for not being in compliance with the 7requirements of this section. AB922,38Section 3. Nonstatutory provisions.AB922,3,169(1) Location accessibility. The department of transportation shall consult 10with the Aging and Disability Resource Center in each county of this state and with 11individuals who have lived experience when determining what modifications are 12needed at office locations of the department to meet the accessibility standards 13required under s. 106.53 and when developing the reports required under this 14section. The department shall submit to the governor, to the appropriate standing 15committees of the legislature in the manner provided under s. 13.172 (3), and to the 16secretary of workforce development all of the following reports:AB922,3,2217(a) No later than January 1, 2027, a report that identifies the locations that 18require modifications based on the severity of need, ranked from those locations 19that provide no access to disabled individuals to those that provide full access. The 20report shall also include information about the current limitations that prevent 21each location from being fully accessible to the public and an outline of the 22modification projects necessary to meet the requirements of s. 106.53.AB922,4,223(b) No later than July 1, 2027, a report that includes a priority list of locations 24to be modified identified in the report under par. (a) and a list that identifies each 1location for which the estimated cost of the needed modifications is less than 2$50,000.AB922,4,53(c) No later than January 1, 2028, a report that includes cost estimates for all 4modifications necessary to meet the accessibility standards required under s. 5106.53.AB922,4,86(d) No later than June 30, 2028, a report that includes a detailed explanation 7of the modification projects outlined in the report under par. (a) that have been 8completed.AB922,4,99